Utah statutes.
76-9-401.   Definitions.

For purposes of this part:

(1)  "Private place" means a place where one may reasonably expect to be safe from casual or hostile intrusion or surveillance.

(2)  "Eavesdrop" means to overhear, record, amplify, or transmit any part of a wire or oral communication of others without the consent of at least one party thereto by means of any electronic, mechanical, or other device.

(3)  "Public" includes any professional or social group of which the victim of a defamation is a member.

